Tennessee, session 114, SB2619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-306(a), is amended by
deleting "one (1) year" and substituting "three (3) years", and by adding the following sentence
at the end of the subsection:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, the state is responsible for all costs of
incarceration after the first year.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-314(a), is amended by
deleting "periodic or split confinement not to exceed one (1) year" and substituting "periodic
confinement not to exceed one (1) year or split confinement not to exceed three (3) years".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2619
010901
- 1 -